Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.470

State patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account.

The state patrol nonappropriated airplane revolving account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from aircraft user fees paid by other agencies and private users as reimbursement for the use of the patrol's aircraft that are primarily for purposes other than highway patrol must be deposited into the account. Expenditures from the account may be used only for expenses related to these aircraft. Only the chief of the Washington state patrol or the chief's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2003 c 360 s 1501.]

NOTES:

Severability—2003 c 360: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 2003 c 360 s 1502.]

Effective date—2003 c 360: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 19, 2003]." [ 2003 c 360 s 1503.]